resources/dicts/fr-classique+reforme1990.aff
FLAG long
PFX L' Y 34
PFX L' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 98
PFX L' a l'A a 98
PFX L' à l'À à 98
PFX L' â l'Â â 98
PFX L' e l'E e 98
PFX L' é l'É é 98
PFX L' è l'È è 98
PFX L' ê l'Ê ê 98
PFX L' i l'I i 98
PFX L' î l'Î î 98
PFX L' o l'O o 98
PFX L' ô l'Ô ô 98
PFX L' u l'U u 98
PFX L' y l'Y y 98
PFX L' h l'H h 98
PFX L' œ l'Œ œ 98
PFX L' æ l'Æ æ 98
PFX L' 0 L' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 98
PFX L' a L'A a 98
PFX L' à L'À à 98
PFX L' â L'Â â 98
PFX L' e L'E e 98
PFX L' é L'É é 98
PFX L' è L'È è 98
PFX L' ê L'Ê ê 98
PFX L' i L'I i 98
PFX L' î L'Î î 98
PFX L' o L'O o 98
PFX L' ô L'Ô ô 98
PFX L' u L'U u 98
PFX L' y L'Y y 98
PFX L' h L'H h 98
PFX L' œ L'Œ œ 98
PFX L' æ L'Æ æ 98

PFX D' Y 34
PFX D' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 96
PFX D' a d'A a 96
PFX D' à d'À à 96
PFX D' â d'Â â 96
PFX D' e d'E e 96
PFX D' é d'É é 96
PFX D' è d'È è 96
PFX D' ê d'Ê ê 96
PFX D' i d'I i 96
PFX D' î d'Î î 96
PFX D' o d'O o 96
PFX D' ô d'Ô ô 96
PFX D' u d'U u 96
PFX D' y d'Y y 96
PFX D' h d'H h 96
PFX D' œ d'Œ œ 96
PFX D' æ d'Æ æ 96
PFX D' 0 D' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 96
PFX D' a D'A a 96
PFX D' à D'À à 96
PFX D' â D'Â â 96
PFX D' e D'E e 96
PFX D' é D'É é 96
PFX D' è D'È è 96
PFX D' ê D'Ê ê 96
PFX D' i D'I i 96
PFX D' î D'Î î 96
PFX D' o D'O o 96
PFX D' ô D'Ô ô 96
PFX D' u D'U u 96
PFX D' y D'Y y 96
PFX D' h D'H h 96
PFX D' œ D'Œ œ 96
PFX D' æ D'Æ æ 96

PFX Q' Y 34
PFX Q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 104
PFX Q' a qu'A a 104
PFX Q' à qu'À à 96
PFX Q' â qu'Â â 104
PFX Q' e qu'E e 104
PFX Q' é qu'É é 104
PFX Q' è qu'È è 104
PFX Q' ê qu'Ê ê 104
PFX Q' i qu'I i 104
PFX Q' î qu'Î î 104
PFX Q' o qu'O o 104
PFX Q' ô qu'Ô ô 104
PFX Q' u qu'U u 104
PFX Q' y qu'Y y 104
PFX Q' h qu'H h 104
PFX Q' œ qu'Œ œ 104
PFX Q' æ qu'Æ æ 104
PFX Q' 0 Qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 104
PFX Q' a Qu'A a 104
PFX Q' à Qu'À à 104
PFX Q' â Qu'Â â 104
PFX Q' e Qu'E e 104
PFX Q' é Qu'É é 104
PFX Q' è Qu'È è 104
PFX Q' ê Qu'Ê ê 104
PFX Q' i Qu'I i 104
PFX Q' î Qu'Î î 104
PFX Q' o Qu'O o 104
PFX Q' ô Qu'Ô ô 104
PFX Q' u Qu'U u 104
PFX Q' y Qu'Y y 104
PFX Q' h Qu'H h 104
PFX Q' œ Qu'Œ œ 104
PFX Q' æ Qu'Æ æ 104

PFX Q* Y 6
PFX Q* 0 quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 201
PFX Q* 0 puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 202
PFX Q* 0 lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 203
PFX Q* 0 Quoiqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 201
PFX Q* 0 Puisqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 202
PFX Q* 0 Lorsqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæAÀÂEÈÉÊIÎOÔUYHŒÆ] 203

PFX Qj Y 1
PFX Qj 0 jusqu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 325

PFX Si Y 1
PFX Si 0 s' . 321

SFX S. Y 2
SFX S. 0 0 . 120
SFX S. 0 s [^sxz] 103

SFX S= Y 1
SFX S= 0 s [^sxz]

SFX X. Y 4
SFX X. 0 0 . 120
SFX X. 0 x [aeoœ]u 103
SFX X. l ux al 103
SFX X. il ux ail 103

SFX A. Y 9
SFX A. 0 0 . 120
SFX A. an en an 103
SFX A. f ves f 103
SFX A. h hes h 103
SFX A. s ses s 103
SFX A. x xes x 103
SFX A. y ies y 103
SFX A. zz zzes zz 103
SFX A. z zzes [^z]z 103

SFX I. Y 7
SFX I. 0 0 . 120
SFX I. a e a 103
SFX I. e i e 103
SFX I. en ina en 103
SFX I. o i o 103
SFX I. um a um 103
SFX I. us i us 103

SFX F. Y 72
SFX F. 0 0 . 166
SFX F. 0 s [eë] 167
SFX F. e 0 [éiï]e 89
SFX F. e s [éiï]e 90
SFX F. rice eur [dt]rice 89
SFX F. rice eurs [dt]rice 90
SFX F. de d de 89
SFX F. de ds de 90
SFX F. fe f fe 89
SFX F. fe fs fe 90
SFX F. anche anc anche 89
SFX F. anche ancs anche 90
SFX F. èche ec èche 89
SFX F. èche ecs èche 90
SFX F. aiche ais aiche 125
SFX F. aîche ais aîche 125
SFX F. khe kh khe 89
SFX F. khe khs khe 90
SFX F. he h [ut]he 89
SFX F. he hs [ut]he 90
SFX F. ke k ke 89
SFX F. ke ks ke 90
SFX F. le l [aiouû]le 89
SFX F. le ls [aiouû]le 90
SFX F. lle l [eiu]lle 89
SFX F. lle ls [eiu]lle 90
SFX F. ne n [aiou]ne 89
SFX F. ne ns [aiou]ne 90
SFX F. nne n [aeo]nne 89
SFX F. nne ns [aeo]nne 90
SFX F. ène en ène 89
SFX F. ène ens ène 90
SFX F. igne in igne 89
SFX F. igne ins igne 90
SFX F. re r [aiuûy]re 89
SFX F. re rs [aiuûy]re 90
SFX F. ère er ère 89
SFX F. ère ers ère 90
SFX F. se s [^us]se 125
SFX F. esse e [^eo].esse 89
SFX F. esse es [^eo].esse 90
SFX F. eresse eur eresse 89
SFX F. eresse eurs eresse 90
SFX F. oresse eur oresse 89
SFX F. oresse eurs oresse 90
SFX F. sse s [^e]sse 125
SFX F. use us [^eo]use 125
SFX F. euse eur euse 89
SFX F. euse eurs euse 90
SFX F. te t [^èt]te 89
SFX F. te ts [^èt]te 90
SFX F. tte t tte 89
SFX F. tte ts tte 90
SFX F. ète et ète 89
SFX F. ète ets ète 90
SFX F. ue u [^gq]ue 89
SFX F. ue us [^gq]ue 90
SFX F. gue g gue 89
SFX F. gue gs gue 90
SFX F. cque c cque 89
SFX F. cque cs cque 90
SFX F. que c [^c]que 89
SFX F. que cs [^c]que 90
SFX F. ève ef ève 89
SFX F. ève efs ève 90
SFX F. ve f [iïu]ve 89
SFX F. ve fs [iïu]ve 90
SFX F. uë u uë 89
SFX F. uë us uë 90
SFX F. üe u üe 89
SFX F. üe us üe 90
SFX F. ze z ze 125

SFX W. N 8
SFX W. 0 0 . 166
SFX W. e es e 167
SFX W. ce x ce 125
SFX W. use ux [eo]use 125
SFX W. ausse aux ausse 125
SFX W. ousse oux ousse 125
SFX W. ale al ale 89
SFX W. ale aux ale 90

SFX S* Y 2
SFX S* 0 0/50 [^sxz] 120
SFX S* 0 s/9 [^sxz] 103

SFX X* Y 4
SFX X* 0 0/50 . 120
SFX X* 0 x/9 [aeoœ]u 103
SFX X* l ux/9 al 103
SFX X* il ux/9 ail 103

SFX A* Y 16
SFX A* an an/50 an 120
SFX A* an en/9 an 103
SFX A* f f/50 f 120
SFX A* f ves/9 f 103
SFX A* h h/50 h 120
SFX A* h hes/9 h 103
SFX A* s s/50 s 120
SFX A* s ses/9 s 103
SFX A* x h/50 x 120
SFX A* x hes/9 x 103
SFX A* y y/50 y 120
SFX A* y ies/9 y 103
SFX A* zz zz/50 zz 120
SFX A* zz zzes/9 zz 103
SFX A* z z/50 [^z]z 120
SFX A* z zzes/9 [^z]z 103

SFX I* Y 12
SFX I* a a/50 a 120
SFX I* a e/9 a 103
SFX I* e e/50 e 120
SFX I* e i/9 e 103
SFX I* en en/50 en 120
SFX I* en ina/9 en 103
SFX I* o o/50 o 120
SFX I* o i/9 o 103
SFX I* um um/50 um 120
SFX I* um a/9 um 103
SFX I* us us/50 us 120
SFX I* us i/9 us 103

SFX F* Y 59
SFX F* 0 0/50 . 166
SFX F* 0 s/9 [eë] 167
SFX F* e 0/50 [éiï]e 89
SFX F* e s/9 [éiï]e 90
SFX F* rice eur/50 [dt]rice 89
SFX F* rice eurs/9 [dt]rice 90
SFX F* de d/50 de 89
SFX F* de ds/9 de 90
SFX F* he h/50 [ut]he 89
SFX F* he hs/9 [ut]he 90
SFX F* èke ek/50 èke 89
SFX F* èke eks/9 èke 90
SFX F* le l/50 [aiouû]le 89
SFX F* le ls/9 [aiouû]le 90
SFX F* lle l/50 [eiu]lle 89
SFX F* lle ls/9 [eiu]lle 90
SFX F* ne n/50 [aiou]ne 89
SFX F* ne ns/9 [aiou]ne 90
SFX F* nne n/50 [aeo]nne 89
SFX F* nne ns/9 [aeo]nne 90
SFX F* gne n/50 igne 89
SFX F* gne ns/9 igne 90
SFX F* re r/50 [aiuûy]re 89
SFX F* re rs/9 [aiuûy]re 90
SFX F* ère er/50 ère 89
SFX F* ère ers/9 ère 90
SFX F* se s/50 [^us]se 125
SFX F* esse e/50 [^eo].esse 89
SFX F* esse es/9 [^eo].esse 90
SFX F* eresse eur/50 eresse 89
SFX F* eresse eurs/9 eresse 90
SFX F* oresse eur/50 oresse 89
SFX F* oresse eurs/9 oresse 90
SFX F* sse s/50 [^e]sse 125
SFX F* use us/50 [^eo]use 125
SFX F* euse eur/50 euse 89
SFX F* euse eurs/9 euse 90
SFX F* te t/50 [^èt]te 89
SFX F* te ts/9 [^èt]te 90
SFX F* tte t/50 tte 89
SFX F* tte ts/9 tte 90
SFX F* ète et/50 ète 89
SFX F* ète ets/9 ète 90
SFX F* ue u/50 [^gq]ue 89
SFX F* ue us/9 [^gq]ue 90
SFX F* gue g/50 gue 89
SFX F* gue gs/9 gue 90
SFX F* cque c/50 cque 89
SFX F* cque cs/9 cque 90
SFX F* que c/50 [^c]que 89
SFX F* que cs/9 [^c]que 90
SFX F* ève ef/50 ève 89
SFX F* ève efs/9 ève 90
SFX F* ve f/50 [iïu]ve 89
SFX F* ve fs/9 [iïu]ve 90
SFX F* uë u/50 uë 89
SFX F* uë us/9 uë 90
SFX F* üe u/50 üe 89
SFX F* üe us/9 üe 90

SFX W* Y 7
SFX W* 0 0/50 . 166
SFX W* e es/9 e 167
SFX W* ce x/50 ce 125
SFX W* use ux/50 [eo]use 125
SFX W* ousse oux/50 ousse 125
SFX W* ale al/50 ale 89
SFX W* ale aux/9 ale 90

PFX Um Y 30
PFX Um 0 0/259 .
PFX Um 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 98
PFX Um 0 d'/1 [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 96
PFX Um 0 yotta/1 .
PFX Um 0 zetta/1 .
PFX Um 0 exa/1 .
PFX Um 0 l'exa . 98
PFX Um 0 d'exa/1 . 96
PFX Um 0 peta/1 .
PFX Um 0 péta/1 .
PFX Um 0 téra/1 .
PFX Um 0 giga/1 .
PFX Um 0 méga/1 .
PFX Um 0 kilo/1 .
PFX Um 0 hecto/1 .
PFX Um 0 l'hecto . 98
PFX Um 0 d'hecto/1 . 96
PFX Um 0 déca/1 .
PFX Um 0 déci/1 .
PFX Um 0 centi/1 .
PFX Um 0 milli/1 .
PFX Um 0 micro/1 .
PFX Um 0 nano/1 .
PFX Um 0 pico/1 .
PFX Um 0 femto/1 .
PFX Um 0 atto/1 .
PFX Um 0 l'atto . 98
PFX Um 0 d'atto/1 . 96
PFX Um 0 zepto/1 .
PFX Um 0 yocto/1 .

PFX Ui Y 30
PFX Ui 0 0 .
PFX Ui 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 98
PFX Ui 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyœæ] 96
PFX Ui 0 yotta .
PFX Ui 0 zetta .
PFX Ui 0 exa .
PFX Ui 0 l'exa . 98
PFX Ui 0 d'exa . 96
PFX Ui 0 peta .
PFX Ui 0 péta .
PFX Ui 0 téra .
PFX Ui 0 giga .
PFX Ui 0 méga .
PFX Ui 0 kilo .
PFX Ui 0 hecto .
PFX Ui 0 l'hecto . 98
PFX Ui 0 d'hecto . 96
PFX Ui 0 déca .
PFX Ui 0 déci .
PFX Ui 0 centi .
PFX Ui 0 milli .
PFX Ui 0 micro .
PFX Ui 0 nano .
PFX Ui 0 pico .
PFX Ui 0 femto .
PFX Ui 0 atto .
PFX Ui 0 l'atto . 98
PFX Ui 0 d'atto . 96
PFX Ui 0 zepto .
PFX Ui 0 yocto .

PFX U. Y 20
PFX U. 0 Y .
PFX U. 0 Z .
PFX U. 0 E .
PFX U. 0 P .
PFX U. 0 T .
PFX U. 0 G .
PFX U. 0 M .
PFX U. 0 k .
PFX U. 0 h .
PFX U. 0 da .
PFX U. 0 d .
PFX U. 0 c .
PFX U. 0 m .
PFX U. 0 µ .
PFX U. 0 n .
PFX U. 0 p .
PFX U. 0 f .
PFX U. 0 a .
PFX U. 0 z .
PFX U. 0 y .

PFX n' Y 1
PFX n' 0 n' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 323

PFX q' Y 1
PFX q' 0 qu' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 104

PFX d' Y 1
PFX d' 0 d' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 96

PFX j' Y 1
PFX j' 0 j' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 326

PFX c' Y 2
PFX c' 0 c' [eé] 204
PFX c' 0 ç' a 204

PFX l' Y 1
PFX l' 0 l' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 98

PFX m' Y 1
PFX m' 0 m' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 324

PFX t' Y 1
PFX t' 0 t' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 320

PFX s' Y 1
PFX s' 0 s' [aàâeèéêiîoôuyhœæ] 322

SFX zA Y 53
SFX zA voir voir/224 avoir 64
SFX zA voir yant/20 avoir 48
SFX zA avoir eu avoir 85
SFX zA avoir eus avoir 86
SFX zA avoir eue avoir 80
SFX zA avoir eues avoir 81
SFX zA voir i/30 avoir 34
SFX zA voir s/20 avoir 35
SFX zA voir 0/92 avoir 21
SFX zA voir vons/17 avoir 56
SFX zA voir vez/14 avoir 72
SFX zA avoir ont/20 avoir 26
SFX zA voir vais/23 avoir 66
SFX zA voir vais/20 avoir 65
SFX zA voir vait/92 avoir 50
SFX zA voir vions/17 avoir 77
SFX zA voir viez/14 avoir 76
SFX zA voir vaient/20 avoir 51
SFX zA avoir eus/23 avoir 69
SFX zA avoir eus/20 avoir 68
SFX zA avoir eut/92 avoir 53
SFX zA avoir eûmes/17 avoir 63
SFX zA avoir eûtes/14 avoir 62
SFX zA avoir eurent/20 avoir 71
SFX zA voir urai/23 avoir 38
SFX zA voir uras/20 avoir 37
SFX zA voir ura/92 avoir 22
SFX zA voir urons/17 avoir 31
SFX zA voir urez/14 avoir 30
SFX zA voir uront/20 avoir 24
SFX zA voir urais/23 avoir 40
SFX zA voir urais/20 avoir 39
SFX zA voir urait/92 avoir 23
SFX zA voir urions/17 avoir 33
SFX zA voir uriez/14 avoir 32
SFX zA voir uraient/20 avoir 25
SFX zA voir ie/44 avoir 41
SFX zA voir ies/36 avoir 44
SFX zA voir it/92 avoir 27
SFX zA voir yons/56 avoir 74
SFX zA voir yez/31 avoir 73
SFX zA voir ient/20 avoir 28
SFX zA avoir eusse/23 avoir 61
SFX zA avoir eussé avoir 61
SFX zA avoir eussè avoir 61
SFX zA avoir eusses/20 avoir 67
SFX zA avoir eût/92 avoir 52
SFX zA avoir eussions/17 avoir 60
SFX zA avoir eussiez/14 avoir 59
SFX zA avoir eussent/20 avoir 54
SFX zA voir ie/13 avoir 36
SFX zA voir yons/13 avoir 58
SFX zA voir yez/13 avoir 75
